apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="av/is__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imi</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yse</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="solo__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="žąs/is__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imi</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yse</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="od/a__n_f">
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oms</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ose</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omis</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="šu/o__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ns</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niui</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nį</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nyje</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nie</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nimi</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nių</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nims</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nis</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nyse</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nys</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nimis</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nys</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="an/tis__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ties</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiai</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tį</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tyje</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tie</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>timi</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čių</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tims</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tyse</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tys</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>timis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tys</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ses/uo__n_f">
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eriai</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erį</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eryje</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erie</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erimi</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uo</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erims</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eris</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eryse</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erys</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erimis</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erys</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="anglis"><i>angl</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="anatomija"><i>anatomij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="knyga"><i>knyg</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="krateris"><i>krater</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="firma"><i>firm</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="apskritis"><i>apskri</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="informatika"><i>informatik</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="banga"><i>bang</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ekspozicija"><i>ekspozicij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lūšis"><i>lūš</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="santrumpa"><i>santrump</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="akis"><i>ak</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="medžiaga"><i>medžiag</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žuvis"><i>žuv</i><par n="žąs/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="santuoka"><i>santuok</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="diktatūra"><i>diktatūr</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="personifikacija"><i>personifikacij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="taryba"><i>taryb</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="avis"><i>av</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kompanija"><i>kompanij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="diena"><i>dien</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="istorija"><i>istorij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="biologija"><i>biologij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sistema"><i>sistem</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žąsis"><i>žąs</i><par n="žąs/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mama"><i>mam</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="siena"><i>sien</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="laivyba"><i>laivyb</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reakcija"><i>reakcij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="antis"><i>an</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="geležis"><i>gelež</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="padėtis"><i>padėt</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ekonomika"><i>ekonomik</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="valanda"><i>valand</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tuštuma"><i>tuštum</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pagalba"><i>pagalb</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rezidencija"><i>rezidencij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="šaknis"><i>šakn</i><par n="žąs/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="esperanto"><i>esperanto</i><par n="solo__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="solo"><i>solo</i><par n="solo__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="arfa"><i>arf</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rūgštis"><i>rūgš</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="partija"><i>partij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="apimtis"><i>apim</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nosis"><i>nos</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sąsaja"><i>sąsaj</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="šuo"><i>šu</i><par n="šu/o__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="auka"><i>auk</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="apsauga"><i>apsaug</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rizika"><i>rizik</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="moteris"><i>moter</i><par n="žąs/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="architektūra"><i>architektūr</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="alėja"><i>alėj</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jūra"><i>jūr</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aukštuma"><i>aukštum</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mafija"><i>mafij</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vasara"><i>vasar</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leidyba"><i>leidyb</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žmona"><i>žmon</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mirtis"><i>mir</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="liepa"><i>liep</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ausis"><i>aus</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pabaiga"><i>pabaig</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sesuo"><i>ses</i><par n="ses/uo__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lytis"><i>ly</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="panorama"><i>panoram</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atmintis"><i>atmin</i><par n="an/tis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="delta"><i>delt</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sala"><i>sal</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trasa"><i>tras</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vokiečių kalba"><i>vokiečių<b/>kalb</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lenkų kalba"><i>lenkų<b/>kalb</i><par n="od/a__n_f"/></e>
